Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. Qualifications.

§ 24.2-400.
Persons entitled to register and vote.

Any person who is not registered to vote, but would otherwise be a qualified voter, is entitled to register to vote as provided in this chapter. Any person who is registered to vote and is a qualified voter shall be entitled to vote in the precinct where he resides.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-17, 24-22, 24-23; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 2; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-41; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 205, 265; 1974, c. 428; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to discrimination against qualified persons with disabilities in exercising right to vote, see §

51.5-43

.

Law Review.

For essay, “The Downfall of ‘Incumbent Protection’: Case Study and Implications,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 243 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 16, 19, 20, 22.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Homeless residents of the Commonwealth

may register to vote in a locality of the Commonwealth, so long as they have an intention to remain in that locality for an unlimited period of time. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Janet D. Howell, The Honorable Linda T. Puller, and The Honorable Mary Margaret Whipple, Members, Senate of Virginia, 04-30 (5/19/04).

§ 24.2-401.
Persons moving from precinct.

A person who is qualified to vote except for having moved his residence from one precinct to another within the Commonwealth may vote in the precinct from which he has moved in the following November general election and any intervening election unless his registration has been transferred or cancelled as provided in this chapter. In addition, a person may continue to vote in the precinct from which he has moved through the ensuing second general election for federal office, provided that (i) he has moved his residence from one precinct to another in the same registrar’s jurisdiction and the same congressional district; (ii) he has failed to respond to the notice provided in §

24.2-428

; (iii) his registration has not been transferred or cancelled as provided in this chapter; and (iv) he has affirmed orally or in writing his new address before an officer of election at the polling place.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-17, 24-22, 24-23; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 2; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-41; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 205, 265; 1974, c. 428; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73; 1997, c. 346.

§ 24.2-402.
Persons moving from Commonwealth fewer than thirty days before presidential election.

A person who is qualified to vote except for having moved his residence from the Commonwealth after the thirtieth day preceding a presidential election may vote in the precinct from which he has moved only in that election and only for electors of President and Vice President of the United States.

The officers of election shall deliver to any person who asks to vote under this section the paper ballot for electors of President and Vice President of the United States and no other ballot.
The ballot shall be voted, handled, and counted with other like ballots in accordance with the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-17, 24-22, 24-23; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 2; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-41; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 205, 265, § 24.1-41.1; 1974, c. 428; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to permitted use of paper ballots, see §

24.2-646.1

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-403.
Persons under 18 years of age.

Any person who is otherwise qualified and will be 18 years of age on or before the day of the next general election shall be permitted to register in advance and also vote in any intervening primary or special election. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any person who is otherwise qualified and will be 18 years of age on or before the day of the next November general presidential election shall be permitted to register in advance of and also vote in any intervening presidential primary and any other primary held on the same day as the presidential primary.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-17, 24-22, 24-23; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 2; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-41; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 205, 265; 1974, c. 428; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641; 2004, c. 481; 2006, c. 205.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 481 added the last sentence and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 205 substituted “on or before the day of the next” for “at the next” in two places.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-403.1.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Preregistration of persons 16 years of age or older.

Any person who is otherwise qualified and is 16 years of age or older, but who will not be 18 years of age on or before the day of the next general election, may preregister to vote. This preregistration shall not entitle a person 16 years of age or older to vote in any election except as provided in §

24.2-403

.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 217.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 217, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”